Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,060,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for the Minnesota P-20 Education Partnership under Minnesota Statutes, section 127A.70. new text end